trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic.aff
FLAG num
SFX 99 Y 13
SFX 99 0 0/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 h/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 hmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 hm/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 hA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 hn/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 k/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 k/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 kmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 km/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 kn/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 y/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 99 0 nA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|h
SFX 367 Y 7
SFX 367 0 wnh/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 367 0 wnhmA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 367 0 wnhm/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 367 0 wnhA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 367 0 wnhn/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 367 0 wnny/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 367 0 wnnA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 368 Y 5
SFX 368 0 wnk/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 368 0 wnk/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 368 0 wnkmA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 368 0 wnkm/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 368 0 wnkn/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 526 Y 7
SFX 526 0 Ah/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 526 0 AhmA/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 526 0 Ahm/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 526 0 AhA/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 526 0 Ahn/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 526 0 Any/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 526 0 AnA/2,1020 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 0/2,1062 . +Suff-0
SFX 583 Y 2
SFX 583 0 ny/2,1040 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 583 0 nA/2,1040 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 y/2,1001 . +FWSuff-iy-I
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 |t/2,1001 . +NSuff-|t
SFX 573 Y 5
SFX 573 0 h/2,1026 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 573 0 hmA/2,1026 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 573 0 hm/2,1026 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 573 0 hA/2,1026 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 573 0 hn/2,1026 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 388 Y 7
SFX 388 0 wh/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 388 0 whmA/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 388 0 whm/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 388 0 whA/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 388 0 whn/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 388 0 wny/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 388 0 wnA/2,1051 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 574 Y 5
SFX 574 0 k/2,1026 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 574 0 k/2,1026 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 574 0 kmA/2,1026 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 574 0 km/2,1026 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 574 0 kn/2,1026 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 384 Y 7
SFX 384 0 wh/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 384 0 whmA/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 384 0 whm/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 384 0 whA/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 384 0 whn/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 384 0 wny/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 384 0 wnA/2,1050 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 339 Y 5
SFX 339 0 h/2,1042 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 339 0 hmA/2,1042 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 339 0 hm/2,1042 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 339 0 hA/2,1042 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 339 0 hn/2,1042 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 tyn/2,1007 . +NSuff-tayn
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 yn/2,1001 . +NSuff-iyna
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 nA/2,1001 . +FWSuff-nA-us
SFX 263 Y 13
SFX 263 0 y/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yh/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yhmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yhm/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yhA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yhn/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yk/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 yk/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 ykmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 ykm/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 ykn/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 y/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 263 0 ynA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 yn/2,1003 . +NSuff-ayn
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 0/2,1020 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 44 Y 13
SFX 44 0 w/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wh/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 whmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 whm/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 whA/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 whn/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wk/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wk/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wkmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wkm/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wkn/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 y/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 44 0 wnA/2,1000 . +NSuff-wh
SFX 581 Y 5
SFX 581 0 h/2,1040 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 581 0 hmA/2,1040 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 581 0 hm/2,1040 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 581 0 hA/2,1040 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 581 0 hn/2,1040 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 0 n/2,1052 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 wn/2,1000 . +NSuff-wn
SFX 582 Y 5
SFX 582 0 k/2,1040 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 582 0 k/2,1040 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 582 0 kmA/2,1040 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 582 0 km/2,1040 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 582 0 kn/2,1040 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 564 Y 1
SFX 564 0 0/2,1011 . +Suff-0
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 wA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wA
SFX 337 Y 2
SFX 337 0 ny/2,1029 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 337 0 nA/2,1029 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 A/2,1032 . +IVSuff-A
SFX 356 Y 7
SFX 356 0 yh/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 356 0 yhmA/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 356 0 yhm/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 356 0 yhA/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 356 0 yhn/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 356 0 yny/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 356 0 ynA/2,1049 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 |t/2,1002 . +NSuff-|t
SFX 298 Y 12
SFX 298 0 h/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 hmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 hm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 hA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 hn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 k/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 k/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 kmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 km/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 kn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 ny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 298 0 nA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|h
SFX 307 Y 45
SFX 307 0 th/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 th/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 th/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 thn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tk/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tk/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tkmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tkm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tkn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAh/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAhmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAhm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAhA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAhn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmAnA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwh/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwhmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwhm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwhA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwhn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tmwnA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnh/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnhmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnhm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnhA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnhn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 307 0 tnnA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-th
SFX 121 Y 12
SFX 121 0 th/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 thmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 thm/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 thA/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 thn/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 tk/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 tk/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 tkmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 tkm/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 tkn/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 ty/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 121 0 tnA/2,1001 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 530 Y 7
SFX 530 0 Ah/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 530 0 AhmA/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 530 0 Ahm/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 530 0 AhA/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 530 0 Ahn/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 530 0 Any/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 530 0 AnA/2,1021 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 222 Y 13
SFX 222 0 y/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yh/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yhmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yhm/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yhA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yhn/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yk/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 yk/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 ykmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 ykm/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 ykn/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 y/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 222 0 ynA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayh
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 0 n/2,1039 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 0/2,1005 . +PVSuff-0a
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 0/2,1040 . +Suff-0
SFX 336 Y 5
SFX 336 0 h/2,1029 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 336 0 hmA/2,1029 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 336 0 hm/2,1029 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 336 0 hA/2,1029 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 336 0 hn/2,1029 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 yn/2,1002 . +NSuff-ayn
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 0/2,1058 . +Suff-0
SFX 74 Y 5
SFX 74 0 h/2,1000 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 74 0 hmA/2,1000 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 74 0 hm/2,1000 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 74 0 hA/2,1000 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 74 0 hn/2,1000 . +FWSuff-hi
SFX 472 Y 7
SFX 472 0 h/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 472 0 hmA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 472 0 hm/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 472 0 hA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 472 0 hn/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 472 0 ny/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 472 0 nA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 y/2,1034 . +IVSuff-y
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 0/2,1003 . +Suff-0
SFX 473 Y 5
SFX 473 0 k/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 473 0 k/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 473 0 kmA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 473 0 km/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 473 0 kn/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 wA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-uwA
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 n/2,1032 . +IVSuff-|n
SFX 73 Y 7
SFX 73 0 wh/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 73 0 whmA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 73 0 whm/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 73 0 whA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 73 0 whn/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 73 0 wny/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 73 0 wnA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-wh
SFX 142 Y 22
SFX 142 0 nh/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nhmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nhm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nhA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nhn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nkm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nkn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nnA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAh/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAhmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAhm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAhA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAhn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAkm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 142 0 nAkn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 324 Y 5
SFX 324 0 h/2,1058 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 324 0 hmA/2,1058 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 324 0 hm/2,1058 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 324 0 hA/2,1058 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 324 0 hn/2,1058 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 69 Y 7
SFX 69 0 h/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 69 0 hmA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 69 0 hm/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 69 0 hA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 69 0 hn/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 69 0 ny/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 69 0 nA/2,1000 . +CVSuff-oh
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 n/2,1024 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 141 Y 2
SFX 141 0 0/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~n
SFX 141 0 A/2,1001 . +PVSuff-~n
SFX 269 Y 13
SFX 269 0 ty/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyh/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyhmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyhm/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyhA/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyhn/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyk/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tyk/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tykmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tykm/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tykn/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 ty/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 269 0 tynA/2,1003 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 439 Y 7
SFX 439 0 wnh/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 439 0 wnhmA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 439 0 wnhm/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 439 0 wnhA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 439 0 wnhn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 439 0 wnny/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 439 0 wnnA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 325 Y 5
SFX 325 0 k/2,1058 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 325 0 k/2,1058 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 325 0 kmA/2,1058 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 325 0 km/2,1058 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 325 0 kn/2,1058 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 56 Y 22
SFX 56 0 nh/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nhmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nhm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nhA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nhn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nkm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nkn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nnA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAh/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAhmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAhm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAhA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAhn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAkm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
SFX 56 0 nAkn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-nh
